Massachusetts, session 194th, H468.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 276 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Employee in charge” the
following definition:-
“Federal Appraisal Subcommittee”, a subcommittee of the Federal Financial Institutions
Examinations Council which consists of the designees of the heads of the federal financial
institutions’ regulatory agencies, pursuant to Title XI of the Financial Institutions Reform,
Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989, and the designee of the Secretary of Housing and Urban
Development.
of 3

SECTION 2. Section 277 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in clause (ii) of subsection (a), the words “engage in or attempt to
perform appraisal management services or to”.
SECTION 3. The first sentence of section 278 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “Financial” the word:- “Institutions”.
SECTION 4. Section 279 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the following:-
(c) A person who directly or indirectly owns more than 10 per cent of an entity applying
for registration and the controlling person and employee in charge of an entity applying for
registration shall be of good moral character as determined by the board and shall, at a minimum,
furnish to the board information concerning the person’s identity, for submission to any
government agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a criminal history
background check as determined by the board. An appraisal management company that is
owned, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, by a person who has had a license or certificate
to act as an appraiser or to engage in any activity related to the transfer of real property refused,
denied, canceled, surrendered in lieu of revocation or revoked in the commonwealth or in any
other state, whether on a temporary or permanent basis, shall not be eligible for registration.
SECTION 5. Section 283 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the first sentence the following sentence:- “The board shall collect and remit to the
Federal Appraisal Subcommittee the annual national registry fee received from each appraisal
management company and each federally regulated appraisal management company as required
of 3

by federal rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to Title XI of the Financial Institutions
Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989, 12 U.S.C. 3331 et seq.”
SECTION 6. Section 285 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in subsection (a), the words “managing principal”.
SECTION 7. Said section 285 of said chapter 112 is hereby further amended by striking
out, in subsection (b), the words “managing principal”.
SECTION 8. Section 286 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in subsection (a), the words “managing principal”.
SECTION 9. Said section 286 of said chapter 112 is hereby further amended by striking
out, in subsection (b), the words “managing principal,”.
SECTION 10. Section 289 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting, in subsection (b), after the words “controlling person,” the word:- “or”.
SECTION 11. Said section 289 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in subsection (b), the words “or managing principal”.
SECTION 12. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3